Virginia statutes. Title 10.1. Conservation.
Article 4. Chippokes Plantation Farm Foundation.

§§ 10.1-217.1 through 10.1-217.6.
Repealed by Acts 2012, cc. 803 and 835, cl. 91.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2012, cc. 803 and 835, cl. 92 provide: “That, on and after July 1, 2012, the Department of Conservation and Recreation shall be the successor in interest in matters related to the duties, responsibilities, and functions of the Chippokes Plantation Farm Foundation. All right, title, and interest in and to any real or tangible personal property vested in the Chippokes Plantation Farm Foundation shall be transferred to and taken as standing in the name of the Department of Conservation and Recreation.”

Former §

10.1-217.1

, which created the Chippokes Plantation Farm Foundation, derived from 1977, c. 57, § 3.1-22.7; 2008, c. 860. Former § 10.1-217.2, pertaining to administration of Foundation; appointment and terms of board of trustees, derived from 1977, c. 57, § 3.1-22.8; 1978, c. 399; 1984, c. 750; 1986, c. 390; 1988, c. 182; 2006, cc. 516, 556; 2008, c. 860. Former § 10.1-217.3, pertaining to the purpose of Foundation; establishment of Chippokes Plantation Model Farm and the Agriculture and Forestry Center, derived from 1977, c. 57, § 3.1-22.9; 1984, c. 750; 1986, c. 390; 2008, c. 860. Former § 10.1-217.4, pertaining to powers of Foundation, derived from 1977, c. 57, § 3.1-22.10; 1986, c. 390; 2008, c. 860. Former § 10.1-217.5, pertaining to executive secretary, derived from 1977, c. 57, § 3.1-22.11; 1988, c. 182; 2008, c. 860. Former § 10.1-217.6, pertaining to gifts and bequests to Foundation, derived from 1977, c. 57, § 3.1-22.12; 1986, c. 390; 2008, c. 860.